Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Chapter 13 Divorce or Separation Proceedings — Support for Children Receiving Public Assistance

15-13-1.
Determination of children receiving public assistance.

The party commencing an action seeking a divorce from the bond of marriage or divorce from bed and board or an order pursuant to §

15-5-19

shall, at the time the proceeding is begun, append to the petition a statement containing the names of all children of the marriage and their ages and stating whether any of the children are at that time recipients of or applicants for public assistance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 258, § 2.

15-13-2.
Setting of support for children receiving public assistance.

If the statement appended to the petition indicates that any child of the marriage is a recipient of or applicant for public assistance, a hearing shall be held as promptly as possible to determine the amount of support to which each child is entitled from the appropriate parent. The department of human services shall be given notice of the hearing and shall appear at the hearing for the purpose of assisting the court in fixing the amount of support. In the absence of the consent of the parties and agreement of the department of human services, the court shall not enter an order providing for support without conducting a hearing.

In fixing the amount of support, which the parent shall be ordered to pay, the court shall take into account the following factors:

All earnings, income, and resources of the parent including real and personal property;

The earnings potential of the parent;

The reasonable necessities of the parent;

The needs of the child for whom support is sought;

The existence and needs of other dependents of the parent; and

Any other factors, which bear upon the needs of the child and the ability of the parent to provide financial support of those needs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 258, § 2; P.L. 1988, ch. 84, § 69.

15-13-3.
Reconsideration of support orders.

Every order entered by the family court providing for support of a child who at the time of entry of the order was not a recipient of or applicant for public assistance shall, in the event the child becomes the recipient of public assistance, be reconsidered de novo upon the petition of a parent or guardian of the child or the department of human services.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall hold a hearing for the purpose of determining the amount of support to which the child is entitled from the appropriate parent. In fixing the amount of support the court shall take into account the factors set forth in §

15-13-2

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 258, § 2.

15-13-3.1.
Enforcement procedures.

In any proceeding brought for failure to make support payments as ordered by the court, upon a showing that the payments are more than forty-five (45) days overdue, the family court may grant an order directing that an execution issue against the wages, debts, earnings, salary, income from trust funds, or profits of the parent responsible for support for the full amount of both the arrears payments and for the satisfaction of current support and maintenance payments until further order of the family court, notwithstanding any statutory limitation on executions issued against the wages, earnings, salary, or other income of the judgment debtor, and the execution shall have priority over any other executions.

No employer shall discharge an employee because his or her wages are subject to execution in accordance with this section or shall discriminate in hiring because of a potential execution.

An employer, in remitting wages levied upon a judgment or order of support, may make a two dollar ($2.00) deduction to defray his or her bookkeeping expenses for each paycheck levied upon out of the funds ordered for support.

In any proceeding brought for failure to make support payments, upon a showing that the payments are more than forty-five (45) days overdue, the family court may grant an order directing that an execution issue against the interest of the responsible parent in and to any real estate or personal property within the jurisdiction of the family court whether that interest is held individually or jointly with others, and the execution shall have priority over any other executions or attachments except as prescribed by applicable federal or state statutes.

The execution shall attach to all real and personal property of the responsible parent when it is recorded with the recorder of deeds for the city or town in which the real estate is located or with the appropriate office for a notice with respect to personal property. The department of administration, division of taxation, child support enforcement agency, shall not be required to pay a recording fee.

Whenever an execution has been filed and there is in the possession of any person having notice of the execution any property which may be subject to the execution, the property shall not be paid over, released, sold, transferred, encumbered, or conveyed unless a release or waiver signed by the director has been delivered to the person in possession or the family court has ordered the release of the execution.

Any person who fails to honor an execution shall be liable to the person entitled to receive the support payments in an amount equal to the debt, which is the basis of the execution, together with costs, interest, and reasonable attorney fees.

Any judgment or order for support issuing from a court of competent jurisdiction of any other state, which passes legislation similar to this chapter and provides for reciprocity to this state, shall have the same force and effect as if the judgment or order originated from the Rhode Island courts.

Interest at the rate of twelve (12%) per annum on any support debt due or owing may be assessed by operation of law unless the responsible parent shall, for good cause shown, be relieved of the obligation to pay the interest by the family court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 191, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 155, § 3.

15-13-3.2.
Transfer of assets.

No person shall proceed to foreclose, sell, or otherwise transfer any property against which an execution granted and reordered pursuant to §

15-13-3.1

may run without first obtaining the approval of the family court. After this, any person to whom an execution has been granted may pursue any remedy available to the holder of an execution by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 191, § 1.

15-13-3.3.
Release of execution.

Any person or the director may release or discharge an execution upon receipt of any other security that the holder of the execution shall deem satisfactory.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 191, § 1.

15-13-4.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of it to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provisions or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 258, § 3.